Utah statutes.
54-14-307.   Stay of board's decision pending review or appeal.

(1)  A petition for review, rehearing, or reconsideration or a petition for judicial review does not stay or suspend the effectiveness of a written decision of the board.

(2)  Any party seeking to stay the effectiveness of a decision of the board shall seek a stay under Section 63G-4-405.

